src/main/resources/com/itextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/uk.xml
во4євод
во4єнач
сво4єчас
сво4єкорис
сво4єрід
хво4є3г4риз
гелі4о
ді4о
еті4о
мі4о
і4он
полі4о
соці4о
фізі4о
хімі4о
гоме4о
ді4алог
ді4оген
дея4к
оо4динок
ао4пік
ао4ха
ео4ха
зо6о
ка5нал
оі4зол
міжу4соб
мете4о
абия4к
нія4к
вия4сн
най3я4сн
нея4сн
поя4сн
проя4сн
роз'я4сн
ро5з4ора.    
ро5з4о5рам    
ро5з4орах    
ро5з4ори     
ро5з4оро     
ро5з4ору     
ро5з4оря     
ро5з4орю     
ро5з4орі     
ро6з5о4ри.   
розо4ра     
розо4ре      
розо4реш     
розо4рн
напоу4м
неа4би      
ео4цін
оо4цін
доу4к
доу4м
ео4бур
ео4голош
ео4зор
бальне4о
не4оліт
не4омальт
не4оклас
не4окомун
не4оландш
не4олог
не4олібер
не4онац
не4офіт
нею4н
нея4к
нея4рок 
но4к3а4ут 
пі5в4оні
піво4с
пале4о
па4н3о4тець
.пе4ом.
д3у4сім
п4о5бере
ао4хот
ое4ко
ео4хот
ео4щад
ао4щад
оо4чищ
поя4с
роз'я4р
те4одоліт
те4олог
те4ософ
оо4біг
оу4сун
оу4ком
пів3о4вал
а3у4дар
о3у4дар
з3у4дар
в3у4дар
контр3у4дар
о3о4кисл
и3о4кисл
ень7о4кисл
е3о4кисл
х3о4кисл
и3і4стор
о3і4стор
і3і4стор
а3і4стор
я3і4стор
е3і4стор
наді4стор
най3і4стор
пів3і4стор
перед3і4стор
пост3і4стор
ар4т3афіш
ар4т3взвод
ар4т3десант
ар4т3кафе
ар4т3майс
ар4т3медіа
ар4т3мейс
ар4т3мін
ар4т3о4бстр
ар4т3о4дин
ар4т3о4збр
ар4т3під
ар4т3рин
ар4т3у4стан
ар4т3факт
ар4т3хім
ар4т3центр
наді4стот
найі4стот
еі4стот
оі4стот
ау4т3екол
оо4чист
з3а4кт
оа4кт
еа4кт
гіпер3а4кт
найа4кт 
піва4кт
ао4браз
ео4браз
оо4браз
граф3о4браз
най3о4браз
супер3о4браз
ар4т3мейст
баге4р3мейст
бале4т3мейст
бран4д3мейст
ва4ль4д3мейст
ве4ль4т3мейст
го4ф3мейст
гро4с3мейст
декре4т3мейст
до4к3мейст
капе4ль3мейст
кварти4р3мейст
конце4р4т3мейст
кра4н3мейст
полі4ц3мейст
по4ш4т3мейст
фо4р4с4т3мейст
хо4р3мейст
шапі4т3мейст
шта4л3мейст
єге4р3мейст
иа4варі
яа4варі
оа4варі
еа4варі
беза4варі
між3а4варі
над3а4варі
пост3а4варі
напів3а4варі
перед3а4варі
супер3а4варі
аа4дрес
еа4дрес
оа4дрес
іа4дрес
без3а4дрес
ае4фект
ее4фект
ое4фект
най3е4фект
супер3е4фект
ое4місі
ие4місі
яе4місі
ее4місі
безе4місі
гіпер3е4місі
еу4бог
й3у4бог
ий4ня
зай4ня
здій4ня
най4ня
обій4ня
перей4ня
підій4ня
прий4м
пій4м
дій4ма
вий4м
най4ма
зай4м
д4о3й4м
обой4м
прой4м
обій4м
перей4м
безу4гл
безу4пин
бло4к3пост
.блі4ц3ана
.блі4ц3криг
.блі4ц3опит
.блі4ц3торг
.блі4ц3тур
.блі4ц3і4спит
о3а4наліз
бак3а4наліз
ц3а4наліз
ген3а4наліз
з3а4наліз
м3а4наліз
нт3а4наліз
між3а4наліз
полі3а4наліз
ре3а4наліз
оу4год
ау4год
еу4год
пів3у4год
роз3у4год
гос4п3у4год
ео4пис
оо4пис
ао4пис
бо4р4т3мех
бо4р4т3о4пер
бо4р4т3про
бо4р4т3рад
бо4р4т3і4нж
оа4каці
оу4с
оо4держ
оа4на
біблі4о
.на3в4ч
.ви3в4ч
.до3в4ч
.за3в4ч
.по3в4ч
.при3в4ч
ана3в4ч
ена3в4ч
мона3в4ч
жона3в4ч
іона3в4ч
ови3в4ч
еви3в4ч
едо3в4ч
оза3в4ч
по3в4ча
.ом4рі
е3м4рій
.ви3м4р
.віді3м4р
.зав3м4р
.за3м4р
.зі3м4р
.на3м4р
.пере3м4р
.по3м4р
.при3м4р
.роз3м4р
.ум4ри
.ум4рі
.ум4ру
.ум4ре
во4станнє
най3о4станн
перед3о4станн
ие4стет  
ое4стет  
ее4стет  
й3е4стет  
пан3е4стет
пар3е4стет
оо4ктан
іо4ктан
оо4плачув
ео4плачув
перед3о4пла
виу4ди
о3в4каз
е3в4каз
</patterns>
</hyphenation-info>
